Hawaii, session 2026, SB2865.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that hearing loss affects nearly two hundred sixteen thousand Hawaii residents, including seventy-nine thousand residents who report deafness or serious hearing difficulty.  Unfortunately, these conditions are likely to be underreported, and the true number of individuals living with hearing loss is probably higher. The legislature further finds that hearing loss disproportionately affects our kupuna. More specifically, hearing loss affects one in three individuals in their sixties, two-thirds of those in their seventies, and more than eighty per cent of individuals in their eighties.  Among kupuna, untreated hearing loss drives isolation, cognitive decline, dementia, depression, and falls, creating costly social and healthcare impacts. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the department of health to develop and publish a state plan on hearing loss. SECTION 2. (a)  The department of health shall develop and publish a state plan on hearing loss.  At a minimum, the plan shall: (1)  Propose actions to minimize hearing loss and improve the early identification, diagnosis, screening, and treatment of hearing loss; (2)  Identify common issues, unmet needs, and challenges faced by persons living with hearing loss; (3)  Propose actions to develop new services, increase the level of existing services, or take other actions necessary to address the issues, needs, and challenges identified in paragraph (2); and (4)  Address any other matters the department determines to be appropriate. (b)  No later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027, the department of health shall submit an interim report to the legislature that includes: (1)  The department's progress in developing the state plan on hearing loss pursuant to subsection (a); and (2)  Preliminary findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation. (c) No later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2028, the department of health shall submit to the legislature and publish on its website a final report that includes: (1)  The finalized state plan on hearing loss pursuant to subsection (a); and (2)  Any other findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________